North Dakota, session 69, HB1531.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION - GENERAL FUND - AGRICULTURE COMMISSIONER -
IRRIGATION EXPANSION STUDY - ONE-TIME FUNDING - REPORT TO THE LEGISLATIVE
MANAGEMENT.
1. There is appropriated out of any moneys in the general fund in the state treasury, not
otherwise appropriated, the sum of $75,000, or so much of the sum as may be necessary, to
the agriculture commissioner for the purpose of contracting with a consultant to study the
potential benefits of expanding irrigation throughout the state, for the biennium beginning
July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027. The appropriation in this section is considered a
one-time funding item.
2. The consultant shall study:
a. The potential economic benefits of increased irrigation and improved water conveyance
in rural communities of the state;
b. The ramifications of failing to construct and implement irrigation infrastructure as
originally designed under the Pick-Sloan Flood Control Act of 1944 [Pub. L. 78-534;
58 Stat. 887];
c. A comparison of the economic contribution between irrigated land and nonirrigated land;
d. A comparison of the economic contribution between using subsurface water
management systems and land not using subsurface water management systems; and
e. Any other factors that would improve and expand irrigation in the state along with any
perceived benefits from expanded irrigation.
3. The agriculture commissioner is exempt from the state purchasing practices under chapter
54-44.4 when contracting for services to accomplish the study.
4. Before July 1, 2026, the agriculture commissioner shall present the findings and
recommendations of the study, and any proposed legislation necessary to implement the
recommendations, to the legislative management.

H. B. NO. 1531 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1531.
House Vote: Yeas 83 Nays 9 Absent 2
Senate Vote: Yeas 45 Nays 1 Absent 1
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State